Maryland, session 2026, SB0677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–306.
(a) Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the Secretary shall issue a
permit within a reasonable time to a person who the Secretary finds:
(1) (i) is at least 21 years old; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0677*

SENATE BILL 677
(ii) is a person who is a member of the uniformed services or the
National Guard;
(2) (i) has not been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor for which
a sentence of imprisonment for more than 1 year has been imposed; or
(ii) if convicted of a crime described in item (i) of this item, has been
pardoned or has been granted relief under 18 U.S.C. § 925(c);
(3) has not been convicted of a crime involving the possession, use, or
distribution of a controlled dangerous substance;
(4) is not on supervised probation for:
(i) conviction of a crime punishable by imprisonment for 1 year or
more;
(ii) a violation of § 21–902(b) or (c) of the Transportation Article; or
(iii) violating a protective order under § 4–509 of the Family Law
Article;
(5) is not presently an alcoholic, addict, or habitual user of a controlled
dangerous substance unless the habitual use of the controlled dangerous substance is under
legitimate medical direction;
(6) does not suffer from a mental disorder as defined in § 10–101(i)(2) of
the Health – General Article and have a history of violent behavior against the person or
another;
(7) has not been involuntarily admitted for more than 30 consecutive days
to a facility as defined in § 10–101 of the Health – General Article;
(8) is not a respondent against whom:
(i) a current non ex parte civil protective order has been entered
under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article;
(ii) a current extreme risk protective order has been entered under §
5–601 of this title; or
(iii) any other type of current court order has been entered
prohibiting the person from purchasing or possessing firearms;
(9) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, has successfully
completed prior to application and each renewal, a firearms training course approved by

SENATE BILL 677 3
the Secretary that meets the minimum criteria specified in subsection (a–1) of this section;
and
(10) based on an investigation:
(i) has not exhibited a propensity for violence or instability that may
reasonably render the person’s possession of a handgun a danger to the person or to
another; and
(ii) is not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law from
purchasing or possessing a handgun.
(a–1) The firearms training course required under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(1) (i) for an initial application, a minimum of 16 hours of in–person
instruction by a qualified handgun instructor; or
(ii) for a renewal application, 8 hours of in–person instruction by a
qualified handgun instructor;
(2) classroom instruction on:
(i) State and federal firearm laws, including laws relating to:
1. self–defense;
2. defense of others;
3. defense of property;
4. [the safe storage of firearms;
5. the circumstances under which an individual becomes
prohibited from possessing a firearm under State and federal law, including becoming a
respondent against whom:
A. a current non ex parte civil protective order has been
entered under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article;
B. an order for protection, as defined in § 4–508.1 of the
Family Law Article, has been issued by a court of another state or a Native American tribe
and is in effect; or
C. a current extreme risk protective order has been entered
under Subtitle 6 of this title;

SENATE BILL 677
6. the requirements and options for surrendering,
transferring, or otherwise disposing of a firearm after becoming prohibited from possessing
a firearm under State or federal law;
7. the requirements for reporting a loss or theft of a firearm
to a law enforcement agency as required by § 5–146 of this title;
8. the firearms and firearm accessories which are banned
under State and federal law;
9. the types of firearms that require a special permit or
registration to acquire or possess under State or federal law;
10. the law prohibiting straw purchases;
11.] the law concerning armed trespass under § 6–411 of the
Criminal Law Article; and
[12.] 5. the locations where a person is prohibited from
possessing a firearm regardless of whether the person possesses a permit issued under this
subtitle;
[(ii) home firearm safety;
(iii) handgun mechanisms and operations;]
(II) FIREARM TRAINING, INCLUDING:
1. HANDGUN NOMENCLATURE AND SELECTING A
HANDGUN FOR SELF–DEFENSE;
2. AMMUNITION KNOWLEDGE AND DEFENSIVE
AMMUNITION SELECTION;
3. BASIC DEFENSIVE HANDGUN SKILLS;
4. DRAWING A HANDGUN FROM CONCEALMENT;
5. LOADING AND STOPPAGE REMEDIATION;
6. MINDSET, INCLUDING RESPONDING TO AN ATTACK
AND THE AFTERMATH OF AN ATTACK;
7. HANDGUN CONCEALMENT AND CARRY MODES;

SENATE BILL 677 5
8. HOME FIREARM SAFETY; AND
9. SAFE FIREARM STORAGE, CLEANING, AND
MAINTENANCE;
[(iv)] (III) conflict de–escalation and resolution;
[(v)] (IV) anger management; and
[(vi)] (V) suicide prevention; and
(3) a firearm qualification component that includes live–fire shooting
exercise on a firing range and requires the applicant to demonstrate:
(i) safe handling of a handgun; and
(ii) shooting proficiency with a handgun.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.